Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202658-701
Act, how cited.

Sections 58-701 to 58-713 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Affordable Housing Act.

Laws 1996, LB 1322, § 11;

Laws 1997, LB 864, § 8;

Laws 2025, LB288, § 9;

Laws 2026, LB768, § 4.
July 18, 2026